Hawaii statutes.
[§302D-28.5] Financial
insolvency. (a) In the event that any public charter school becomes
financially insolvent, the school shall be deemed to have surrendered its
charter. For purposes of this section, a school shall be determined to be
financially insolvent when it is unable to pay its staff when payroll is due.

(b) In the event that any public charter
school becomes financially insolvent, the authorizer shall adopt a closure
protocol as described under section 302D-19(a). [L 2015, c 110, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next